Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
In General
§ 29-3-41.
Lease of forest lands restricted.

After any parcels of sixteenth section lands have been classified as hereinabove provided, all land which has been classified as forest land and which is not now under lease shall hereafter not be leased. The lands classified as forest lands which may be under a lease that has a fixed date of expiration shall not be re-leased when said lease expires; nor shall the lessee be permitted to cut or remove any timber therefrom except according to the terms of his lease. Such lands shall be reserved and kept as forest lands. Provided further, that the mineral rights in all such lands may be leased for oil, gas, or mineral purposes, and the board of education may grant leases to the surface of said lands classified as forest, which are limited to hunting and fishing rights and activities in relation thereto, and which shall not extend for a period longer than fifteen (15) years. It shall be the duty of the board of education to lease said hunting and fishing rights at public contract after having advertised same for rent in a newspaper published in said county or, if no newspaper be published in said county, then in a newspaper having a general circulation therein, for two (2) successive weeks, the first being at least ten (10) days prior to said public contract. Said hunting and fishing rights shall be leased to the person offering the highest annual rental. Bids received by the board of education in response to the advertisement shall be opened at a regular or special meeting of the board. The board of education, at its option, may reject all bids or accept the highest and best bid received in response to the advertisement, or the board of education may hold an auction among those who submitted bids in response to the advertisement, provided that three (3) or more persons who submitted bids in response to the advertisement participate in the auction. The opening bid at the auction shall be the highest bid received in response to the advertisement. Provided that if the board of education receives an acceptable bid or elects to hold an auction, the most recent holder of said hunting and fishing rights if it shall have made an offer, shall have the final right to extend its lease for the term advertised at the annual rental equal to said highest offer received by the board of education, or equal to the highest bid offered at the auction, as the case may be.

If no bid acceptable to the board of education is received after said advertisement, the board of education may, within ninety (90) days, lease same by private contract for an amount greater than the highest bid previously rejected. If the board of education determines to lease the land by private contract, the most recent holder of said hunting and fishing rights, if it shall have made an offer, shall have the final right to extend its lease on the same terms and conditions as those contained in the private contract proposed to be accepted by the board of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-11; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 11; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 22; Laws, 1993, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 29-3-43.
Improvements on forest lands.

If any sixteenth section land is declared forest land at the end of a lease, the board of education shall make an appraisal and either pay a suitable amount to the lessee for the improvements or allow lessee to remove the same from the section land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-15; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 15; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-45.
Management of forest lands.

The board of education shall, by order placed upon its minutes, enter into an agreement with the State Forestry Commission for the general supervision and management of all lands classified as forest lands and of all timber or other forest products under the control of the board on sixteenth section lands, and lieu lands which have not been so classified. However, any school board may contract with private persons or businesses for the reforestation of sixteenth section lands and may contract with a registered forester to be paid from the 16th Section Interest Fund for a review of any forestry management decision or forestry practice including the sale of timber for sixteenth section forest land provided that any implementation of a forestry management decision or forestry practice to be taken as a result of the review described in this subsection shall be subject to the approval of both the commission and the Secretary of State. When such agreement has been entered into, no timber or other forest products shall be sold from any of the sixteenth section lands or lieu lands except such as have been marked or approved for cutting by the State Forestry Commission’s employees. The Forestry Commission, or its designated employee, shall fix the minimum total cash price or minimum price per unit, one thousand (1,000) feet or other measure, at which the marked timber or other forest products shall be sold. The sales may be made for a lump sum or upon a unit price as in the opinion of the board may be calculated to bring the greatest return. Sales shall be made upon such other terms and conditions as to manner of cutting, damages for cutting of unmarked trees, damages to trees not cut and other pertinent matters as the board of education shall approve.

The State Forestry Commission shall have the sole authority and control in scheduling of all cutting and harvesting of timber or other forest products when such timber stands or other forest products are determined by the State Forestry Commission to be economically ready for cutting and harvesting.

Should a school board disagree with the Forestry Commission concerning the time of cutting and harvesting, the board may make an appeal to the Forestry Commission at a regular monthly scheduled meeting of the commission. If the school board is not satisfied after the appeal to the commission, the board may then appeal to the Secretary of State who will make the final decision as to the time for cutting and harvesting. In the event that the local school board is divested of its management authority under subsection (3) hereof, the Secretary of State after due consultation with the Forestry Commission shall retain the right to make final decisions concerning the management and sale of timber and other forest products.

It is hereby made the duty of the State Forestry Commission, from time to time, to mark timber which should be cut from the lands, to determine what planting, deadening or other forestry improvements should be made, giving due consideration to food and habitat for wildlife, and to report to the appropriate board of education. The State Forestry Commission and the board of education shall supervise the cutting of any timber or harvesting of other forest products sold from the lands herein designated and shall have authority to require any timber-cutting operations on the lands to cease until proper adjustment is made, whenever it shall appear that timber is being cut in violation of the terms of the sale. In the event that it is desired to lease any of such lands or standing timber for turpentine purposes, such lease shall only cover such trees as the State Forestry Commission shall designate, and the commission through its employees shall approve the number of faces, method of chipping and boxing of such timber, and shall fix a minimum total cash price or minimum price per unit.

No sale of any timber, turpentine or other forest products lease shall be made until notice of same shall have been published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for the sale, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition thereto, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding such sale at three (3) public places in such county.

Notwithstanding the above provision pertaining to the sale of any timber, turpentine or other forest products, in the event that timber must be cleared from an existing road or existing utility right-of-way, the public notice requirement may be waived. Prior to waiver of the public notice requirement, the State Forestry Commission must make a finding that, due to the small area of timber to be cleared, a public notice sale would not be in the best interest of the local board of education. If the State Forestry Commission makes such a finding, then it shall set the value of the timber to be paid to the local board of education by the party requesting the timber be removed.

Provided, however, in the case of damage by fire, windstorm or other natural causes which would require immediate sale of the timber, because the time involved for advertisement as prescribed herein would allow decay, rot or destruction substantially decreasing the purchase price to be received had not such delay occurred, the advertisement provisions of this section shall not apply. The local board of education, with a written recommendation from a designated employee of the State Forestry Commission filed in the minutes of the local board of education, shall determine when immediate sale of the timber is required. When the board of education shall find an immediate sale necessary for the causes stated herein, it shall, in its discretion, set the time for receipt of bids on the purchase of the timber, but shall show due diligence in notifying competitive bidders so that a true competitive bid shall be received.

A local board of education having control of the sixteenth section lands in the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 shall be granted emergency powers to take any and all actions of a reasonably prudent trustee acting under emergency conditions to recover damaged timber, prevent further loss or damage to timber, and to minimize economic loss. All such actions shall be taken in consultation with and shall be subject to the prior approval from the Secretary of State and the State Forestry Commission. The emergency powers shall be as follows:

Contract with any individual or entity for management advice, sale of timber, clearing of damage to timber producing lands, transporting of timber, repairing access roads to timber lands, conducting aerial spraying, or taking any other type of action to prevent further loss of timber or diminution in value of existing timber as the result of the incident which necessitated the declaration of a natural disaster. In contracting with any individual or entity, the local board of education shall use its best efforts to ensure that all costs incurred are reasonable and that a fair price is received for all sales.

Enter into agreements with any individual, private company, or other governmental entities for the pooling of resources, or the sharing of costs so as to maximize the mitigation of loss and minimize the expense of mitigating the loss of timber.

Apply for any state, federal, or private party grant or nonrepayable funds to cover costs associated with emergency management contracts, sale timber, including loss for diminution of value, transporting of timber, replanting of timber, repairing access roads to timber, conducting aerial spraying, or reimbursement for any other action taken to prevent further timber damage, as well as mitigating the loss of funds due to damage.

The emergency powers granted herein shall be for a period of one (1) year from the date of designation as a disaster area due to Hurricane Katrina. The emergency powers may be extended for one (1) additional one-year period upon prior written approval from the Secretary of State.

The emergency powers shall also apply to the management of timber by the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

In the event a local board of education is unable to acquire the services of the State Forestry Commission or the Secretary of State to meet an immediate need to salvage, remove or take other appropriate action on damaged timber, the local board of education shall unilaterally be granted the authority to take such actions as necessary regarding the management or sale of timber or other forest products.

In exercising emergency powers, a local board of education or the Secretary of State shall exercise the general powers of a trustee with the same general restrictions and general liabilities of a trustee and shall exercise the care and skill of an ordinary prudent person to protect the beneficiaries of the trust under such emergency circumstances.

Any contractor with a local board of education or the Secretary of State shall be entitled to rely on representations by such board of education or the Secretary of State as to who has authority to enter contracts for the management or sale of timber or other forest products, and reliance on such representations shall not be grounds for voiding any contract.

In the event that any member of a local board of education may have a personal interest, either direct or indirect, in the decisions regarding the management or sale of timber or other forest products or in a contract for the sale of timber or other forest products from sixteenth section school lands under the jurisdiction and control of the board, then the board of education shall automatically be divested of all authority and power to manage and sell timber or other forest products on sixteenth section lands under its control and jurisdiction. The divestiture shall extend for the period of service, and for one (1) year thereafter, of the board member having a direct or indirect personal interest in the sale or decision to sell timber or other forest products.

During the time in which any local board of education may be divested of authority and power to manage and sell timber and other forest products, such authority and power shall be vested in the Secretary of State, as supervisory trustee of sixteenth section lands. Upon the appointment or election of a member of a local board of education who may have such an appointment or election of a member of a local board of education who may have such an interest in decisions and contracts regarding the management and sale of timber or other forest products, the board of education shall immediately notify the Secretary of State in writing. Likewise, the board shall give written notification to the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of any such divestiture period. Any contractor with a local board of education or the Secretary of State shall be entitled to rely on representations by such board or the Secretary of State as to who has authority to enter contracts for the management or sale of timber or other forest products, and reliance on such representations shall not be grounds for voiding any contract.

The laws providing for the management and sale of timber and other forest products by local boards of education shall apply to the management and sale of timber and other forest products by the Secretary of State. The Mississippi Forestry Commission shall provide the Secretary of State with advice and services in the same manner as provided to local boards of education.

The Secretary of State shall be paid all monies derived from the sale of timber or other forest products and shall promptly forward the same to the superintendent of education for such school district with instructions for the proper settlement, deposit and investment of the monies. Such local school board shall reimburse the Secretary of State for all direct costs relating to the management and sale of timber or other forest products, and in the case of a sale of timber or other forest products, the Secretary of State may deduct such direct cost from the proceeds of sale. The Secretary of State shall furnish an itemized listing of all direct cost charged to the local school district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-12; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 12; Laws, 1966, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 24; Laws, 1986, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 29-3-47.
Forestry escrow fund.

For its services the state forestry commission shall be entitled to receive its actual expenses incurred in the discharge of the duties herein imposed. In order to provide funds with which to pay for the general supervision and sale of forest products, fifteen percent (15%) of all receipts from the sales of forest products shall be placed by the board in a forestry escrow fund and reserved to pay for work performed by the state forestry commission. Such payments shall be equal to the actual expenses incurred by the commission as substantiated by itemized bills presented to the board.

Money in the forestry escrow fund may be used to pay for any forestry work authorized during the period of the agreement and shall not be subject to lapse by reason of county budget limitations.

In each school district having need of tree planting and timber stand improvement, the board of education is authorized to place additional amounts in the forestry escrow fund to reimburse the state forestry commission for actual expenses incurred in performing this work, or to pay for any work done under private contract under the supervision of said commission. Such additional amounts may be made available from forest products sales receipts, funds borrowed from the sixteenth section principal fund as is provided for in Section 29-3-113, or any other funds available to the board of education excluding minimum foundation program funds. Expenditures from the forestry escrow fund for tree planting, timber stand improvement, and other forestry work will be limited to payment for work recommended by the forestry commission and agreed to by the board of education.

When it becomes evident that the amount of money in the forestry escrow fund is in excess of the amount necessary to accomplish the work needed to achieve the goals set by the board of education and the forestry commission, the state forestry commission shall advise said board to release any part of such funds as will not be needed, which may then be spent for any purpose authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-13; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 13; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-49.
Agreements for timber improvement.

It shall be the duty of the State Forestry Commission, in the manner provided in Section 29-3-45, to enter into agreements for timber improvement purposes with the board of education upon the request of the board. The contract shall provide for the carrying out of a long-term program of timber improvement, including any or all of the following: The deadening of undesirable hardwoods, the planting of trees, the cutting and maintaining of fire lanes, and the establishment of marked boundaries on all lands classified as forest lands in the agreements, which provide for the reimbursement of all current costs incurred by the State Forestry Commission and the carrying out of the duties required by such agreements. In the alternative, the commission, in its discretion, may have the option to contract with a private contractor, subject to the approval of the board, to perform this work under the supervision of the commission. Payment of the reimbursements as hereinabove set forth to the Forestry Commission, or of compensation due under any such contract with private contractors shall be made upon presentation of itemized bills by the commission or the private contractors, as the case may be, and may be made out of any sixteenth section funds to the credit of, or accruing to, any school district in which such work shall be done, or out of any other funds available to such district, excluding minimum foundation program funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-14; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 14; Laws, 1975, ch. 436; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 26; Laws, 2009, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 29-3-51.
Determination of lands subject to lease.

The chancery courts have jurisdiction to determine, on bill or petition, what lands are or may be subject to lease under provisions of this chapter; but all sixteenth sections, or lands taken in lieu thereof, are presumed to be so subject unless the contrary be shown clearly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6773; 1942, § 6613; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-52.
Prima facie validity of leases executed and recorded in substantial conformity with law.

Any lease of sixteenth section lands, or lands granted in lieu thereof, including leases and any renewal, replacement or extension of such leases granted pursuant to Section 29-3-99, executed and recorded in substantial conformity with the applicable provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be prima facie valid, and defects in ministerial or procedural acts alone shall not affect the validity of any such lease, as far as a bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer for value of any such lease is concerned. Any such purchaser or encumbrancer shall be entitled to rely upon the validity of any such lease insofar as the interest of the state or any political subdivision thereof, the public, or any school district is concerned.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any party from challenging the validity of any lease on the grounds of inadequacy of consideration given for the lands involved in the lease.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 51; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 29-3-53.
Term lessee defined.

Any lease executed pursuant to this chapter shall inure to the benefit of the lessee therein named, his heirs and assigns, and in case the lessee be a corporation, to such lessee and its assigns.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6785; 1942, § 6628; Laws, 1926, ch. 318; Laws, 1930, ch. 278.

§ 29-3-54.
Posting of leased land against trespassers.

Any leaseholder of sixteenth section land, or land granted in lieu thereof, shall be authorized to post such land against trespassers; provided that such posting shall not prohibit the inspection of said lands by individuals responsible for the management or supervision thereof acting in their official capacity. In the event hunting or fishing rights have been leased on lands classified as forest land, the holder of such rights and the state forestry commission shall be authorized to post such land against trespassers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-55. [Codes, 1942, § 6598-17; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 17]

§ 29-3-57.
Superintendent of education to docket leases and collect rentals.

The superintendent of education shall keep a current docket as to the expiration date of all leases on sixteenth section lands; likewise, he shall keep a correct current docket upon the existing leases or any extensions thereof as to the amounts and time of payment of rentals provided for by such lease. It shall be the duty of the superintendent of education to collect promptly all rentals due and all principal and interest due upon loans and investments of sixteenth section funds. Upon a sixty (60) day default in payment of any rentals according to the terms of such lease, the lease shall be declared terminated unless the board of education finds extenuating circumstances were present, and the board shall inaugurate the proper legal proceedings to terminate such lease. The superintendent of education, with the approval of the board of education, may employ an attorney or other person to aid in collecting any such funds when in his opinion the same is necessary, and may pay reasonable compensation therefor out of funds collected, not to exceed in any case twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount actually collected. It shall be the duty of the superintendent of education to supervise generally the administration of all sixteenth section lands within his jurisdiction. In all cases where leases of sixteenth section lands are entered into, it shall be the duty of the superintendent of education to take the notes of the lessees for the rents provided by said lease and turn them over to the county depository and attend to their collection. In the case of the leasing of agricultural lands, the school district shall have the same rights and remedies for the security and collection of such rent as are given by law to agricultural landlords.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6598-16; Laws, 1958, ch. 303, § 16; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-59.
Proceeds of leases.

All rentals, or other revenue payable under any leases executed pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to and collected by the superintendent of education and shall be credited to the township school fund and used and expended in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions as provided by law in the case of other money belonging to such funds. Any superintendent of education receiving any such revenue shall make annual report thereof to the state superintendent of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6784; 1942, § 6625; Laws, 1926, ch. 318; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-61. [Codes, 1930, § 6759; 1942, § 6597; Laws, 1924, ch. 283; Laws, 1930, ch. 278; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex Sess ch. 2, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 411, § 1]

§ 29-3-63.
Right to re-lease or to extend existing lease; minimum annual rental.

The holder of a lease of sixteenth section or lieu land, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease or to extend an existing lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and board of education subject to the classification of said land. Provided, however, no holder of a lease of sixteenth section land classified as agricultural land shall have any priority rights in extending his lease contract, except as otherwise provided in Section 29-3-81. Provided, however, the compensation on an annual basis shall be the fair market rental of the land excluding buildings and improvements made on such land by the lessee, the title to which is not held in trust for the public schools, but in no event shall the compensation be less than the minimum amounts prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

The board of education shall not lease or extend a lease on land classified as industrial or commercial at an annual rental less than five percent (5%) of the current market value, exclusive of buildings or improvements not owned by the school district. Such minimum acceptable percentage shall not apply to land classified as farm-residential, residential, recreational and other land; however, fair market rental will apply to those lands as determined by appraisal, comparative analysis or comparison with the private sector.

The prior right to re-lease or extend an existing oil, gas and mineral lease, or any part thereof, granted under this section shall be conditioned upon the existence of production of oil, gas or other minerals thereunder in paying quantities, or the existence of a well capable of such production, or the existence of drilling or reworking operations at the time of lease expiration. Provided, however, that said lease may, in the discretion of the board of education, be extended only as to the lands included in a unit or units as defined by the appropriate agency having jurisdiction over said unit or units. The replacement lease shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the board of education, provided that the rental and royalty provisions shall not be less than the rental and royalty provisions as set out in the expired lease and the primary term shall not exceed the limitations in Section 29-3-99. Bonus payment for the replacement lease shall be consistent with the requirements set out in Sections 29-3-65 with respect to oil, gas and mineral leases.

Where used in this section and Section 29-3-65, the term “oil and gas lease” or “oil, gas and mineral lease” shall include all leases originally executed pursuant to Section 29-3-99.

The right to re-lease an oil, gas and mineral lease provided in subsection (3) above extends to oil, gas and mineral leases which have already expired as of the effective date of this section, subject to an accounting for production from the date of lease expiration to the date of the replacement lease authorized herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 4; Laws, 1956, ch. 290; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 29; Laws, 1986, ch. 505; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 29-3-65.
Appraisal of lands; adjustment of rental amounts.

One (1) year prior to the date, when any such lands, not subject to competitive bid procedures, shall become available for lease, the board of education shall appoint a competent appraiser to appraise the land and report to the board his recommendation for the fair market rental amount. The board shall then determine whether the same be a reasonable amount, and shall grant the lease pursuant to Section 29-3-63. Provided that in the event any such land becomes available for lease prior to July 1, 1979, an appraisal shall be required prior to the granting of said lease.

The board of education may use rent escalation clauses or other such devices to adjust rental amounts during the lease term. Owners of leaseholds under a lease granted prior to July 1, 1978, which have improvements constructed thereon, shall not be charged for such improvements in successive lease periods unless the lease contract clearly specifies otherwise. The cost of the appraisal under this section shall be paid from any available sixteenth section school funds or other school funds of the district.

The appraisal pertaining to renewal oil, gas and mineral leases executed pursuant to Section 29-3-63 may be made either before or after the expiration of the original lease and shall appraise the fair market value for the bonus to be paid for a renewal lease containing the terms and conditions agreed upon by the holder of the lease and the board of education.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 30; Laws, 1992, ch. 486 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 7, 1992).

§ 29-3-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-67. [Codes, 1942, § 6597-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 7; Laws, 1961, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 3]

§ 29-3-69.
Lease for ground rental.

The board of education may lease school trust lands classified as industrial, commercial, farm-residential, residential, recreational, catfish farming or other for a term not exceeding forty (40) years for a ground rental, payable annually. All leases, except leases of residential or farm-residential lands, made for a ground rental shall contain rent adjustment clauses or other such provisions requiring that the consideration for every lease of such lands shall be adjusted not less than once every ten (10) years from the date of the lease to reflect the current fair market rental value of the lands, exclusive of any improvements thereon. In leases of lands which are or which are to become residential or farm-residential land, the board of education may require a rent adjustment clause in which rents are to be adjusted, provided that such adjustments will not exceed the fair market rental value of the lands, exclusive of improvements thereon, as of the rental adjustment dates. If a rent adjustment clause is not contained in a lease of lands which are or which are to become residential or farm-residential land, the reasons for not including such clause in the lease shall be stated in the lease and entered on the minutes of the board. In the case of uncleared lands, the board of education may lease them for such short terms as may be deemed proper in consideration of the improvement thereof, with the right thereafter to lease or to hold on payment of a ground rental. The board of education may lease not more than three (3) acres of any such lands for a term not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years for a ground rental, payable annually, to any church having its principal place of worship situated on such lands, which has been in continuous operation at that location for not less than twenty-five (25) years at the time of the lease. The consideration for every lease of such lands to a church shall be renegotiated not less than once every twenty-five (25) years from the date of the lease to reflect the current fair market rental value of the lands, exclusive of any improvements thereon.

The board of education may, at any time, by agreement with any lessee of lands, except for lands classified as forest or agricultural, cancel an existing lease and execute a new lease contract on such land where major capital improvements have been made or for the purpose of facilitating the addition of major capital improvements, provided that the rental amount of such new lease shall not be less than the rental amount in the prior lease. The term of such new lease shall not exceed forty (40) years for a ground rental, payable annually, provided that prior to the execution of such new lease contract, the provisions of all applicable statutes setting forth the procedure and requirements for the execution of a lease for sixteenth section lands or lieu lands have been satisfied.

The board of education may find that in the interest of good trust management it may be necessary to grant in the original lease contract an option to renew any lease not subject to competitive bid procedures, for a term not to exceed twenty-five (25) years. If such a finding be made, it shall be entered on the minutes of the board and the option granted; provided that the execution of a new lease shall be required to effectuate the additional lease period and the provisions of all applicable statutes setting forth the procedure and requirements for the execution of a lease for sixteenth section lands or lieu lands have been satisfied.

Subleasing or assignment of any lease of school trust lands executed after July 1, 1978, shall only be allowed when provided in the lease contract or at the discretion of the board of education; provided that permission to sublease or assign shall not be arbitrarily withheld.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 3; Laws, 1977, ch. 478; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 31; Laws, 1984, ch. 322; Laws, 1987, ch. 487; Laws, 1995, ch. 623, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 29-3-71.
Leaseholds subject to taxes.

Sixteenth section lands reserved for the use of schools, or lands reserved or granted in lieu of or as a substitute for the sixteenth sections, shall be liable, after the same shall have been leased, to be taxed as other lands are taxed during the continuance of the lease, but in case of sale thereof for taxes, only the title of the lessee or his heirs or assigns shall pass by the sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-07; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 14; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 8.

§ 29-3-73.
Lands liable for drainage taxes.

Where any school land, generally known as sixteenth sections, reserved for the use of schools, or land reserved or granted in lieu of or substituted for sixteenth sections lies within or partly within any drainage district created under the laws of this state, and will be benefited by such drainage district, such land so benefited shall be liable for its pro rata share of the costs, expenses, taxes, and assessments relating to said district as if owned by an individual, and shall be assessed accordingly, as other lands are assessed. But in case of a sale of such lands for such taxes or assessments, only the title of the lessee holding such lands under lease at the time of the sale shall pass by the sale.

Where such sixteenth section land, or land taken in lieu thereof, shall be held by any lessee, whether his lease shall have heretofore been acquired or shall hereafter be acquired, all such drainage taxes and assessments accruing thereon during such lease shall, in the discretion of the board of education, either be paid by the lessee, his grantees or assigns, or by the board of education, but the liability for such drainage taxes shall be fixed by the lease contract when said lands are leased. Where said lands have been leased by the superintendent of education, with the consent of the board of education in open session, and said lease contract provides that the lessee shall pay all such drainage taxes and assessments, and the lessee has actually entered upon and occupied said lands as lessee and is recognized as such, the school district in which said sixteenth section is located shall not be liable for such drainage taxes on account of the negligence of the secretary in failing to enter the order of the board approving said lease contract on its minutes. All such drainage taxes and assessments accruing on any such lands while the same are not leased shall be paid by the board of education of the school district in which such lands are situated, out of any sixteenth section funds belonging to the township in which such lands are located, which may be on hand at the time when such drainage taxes or assessments become due or which may be thereafter at any time collected or acquired. For the purpose of paying such drainage taxes and assessments, the board of education may borrow all money necessary to pay the same. When any such funds are borrowed as aforesaid, for the purposes aforesaid, the same shall be repaid out of the first sixteenth section fund thereafter derived from the sixteenth section lands so taxed and assessed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6767; 1942, § 6607; Laws, 1924, ch. 267; Laws, 1940, ch. 182; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-75.
Insurance.

Any leaseholder shall have the right at his own expense to keep his interest in the buildings and other improvements on the leased premises insured against loss or damage by fire and windstorm.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-08; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 15; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 9.

§ 29-3-77.
Disposition of buildings.

Where buildings are located on sixteenth section lands which are not subject to an existing lease and such buildings have ceased to be used for the purpose for which they were constructed, the board of education may sell and dispose of such buildings pursuant to the procedures prescribed in Sections 37-7-451 through 37-7-483.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6597-09; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 16; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 10; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 29-3-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§29-3-79. [Codes, 1942, § 6597-10; Laws, 1946, ch. 443, § 11; Laws, 1948, ch. 497, § 11]